trunk/JLanguageTool/src/resource/be/hunspell/be_BY.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3326 Y 1
SFX 3326 0 жваючую .
SFX 1310 Y 1
SFX 1310 0 зіўшых .
SFX 1309 Y 1
SFX 1309 0 зіўшыя .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 ыяй .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 учым .
SFX 1002 Y 1
SFX 1002 0 ляць .
SFX 3786 Y 1
SFX 3786 0 чце .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 ына .
SFX 2988 Y 1
SFX 2988 0 ыне .
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 0 ватым .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 льнага .
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 0 ыкамі .
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 0 аннем .
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 0 хнуўшае .
SFX 4680 Y 1
SFX 4680 0 хнуўшай .
SFX 384 Y 1
SFX 384 0 ніка .
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208 0 іраваўшаму .
SFX 2304 Y 1
SFX 2304 0 ьваючы .
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 0 альнаму .
SFX 4397 Y 1
SFX 4397 0 уха .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 льнаю .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 льная .
SFX 2657 Y 1
SFX 2657 0 тала .
SFX 4841 Y 1
SFX 4841 0 цыйнаму .
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 0 нучых .
SFX 4107 Y 1
SFX 4107 0 нучыя .
SFX 4903 Y 1
SFX 4903 0 етамі .
SFX 4249 Y 1
SFX 4249 0 ель .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 елі .
SFX 4452 Y 1
SFX 4452 0 ізаваўшы .
SFX 2364 Y 1
SFX 2364 0 чыцамі .
SFX 2414 Y 1
SFX 2414 0 іруючую .
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 0 ляюцца .
SFX 4117 Y 1
SFX 4117 0 нучае .
SFX 4116 Y 1
SFX 4116 0 нучай .
SFX 4190 Y 1
SFX 4190 0 ыхай .
SFX 4627 Y 1
SFX 4627 0 атарам .
SFX 4254 Y 1
SFX 4254 0 гадовых .
SFX 4253 Y 1
SFX 4253 0 гадовыя .
SFX 3433 Y 1
SFX 3433 0 кнеш .
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 0 рую .
SFX 4438 Y 1
SFX 4438 0 ізуючага .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 му .
SFX 1138 Y 1
SFX 1138 0 мы .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 мі .
SFX 3841 Y 1
SFX 3841 0 куе .
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 0 куй .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 нічаўшым .
SFX 3108 Y 1
SFX 3108 0 нням .
SFX 1918 Y 1
SFX 1918 0 нскімі .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 ванаю .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 ваная .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 чаўшаму .
SFX 3693 Y 1
SFX 3693 0 шаць .
SFX 1286 Y 1
SFX 1286 0 лялася .
SFX 3451 Y 1
SFX 3451 0 вах .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 ваю .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 вая .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 ваў .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 0 таўшае .
SFX 2787 Y 1
SFX 2787 0 таўшай .
SFX 2774 Y 1
SFX 2774 0 хаўшаму .
SFX 4810 Y 1
SFX 4810 0 анскімі .
SFX 2915 Y 1
SFX 2915 0 арных .
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 0 арныя .
SFX 4405 Y 1
SFX 4405 0 очкам .
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 0 чынай .
SFX 4607 Y 1
SFX 4607 0 жаўшымі .
SFX 1895 Y 1
SFX 1895 0 руючаму .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 0 арнае .
SFX 2922 Y 1
SFX 2922 0 арнай .
SFX 4098 Y 1
SFX 4098 0 саўшага .
SFX 4540 Y 1
SFX 4540 0 оўных .
SFX 4539 Y 1
SFX 4539 0 оўныя .
SFX 4243 Y 1
SFX 4243 0 кнеце .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 еным .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 ліся .
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 0 меру .
SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 0 меры .
SFX 2514 Y 1
SFX 2514 0 дзіўшую .
SFX 4696 Y 1
SFX 4696 0 оўваючы .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 ішся .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 ўскага .
SFX 4125 Y 1
SFX 4125 0 нейшым .
SFX 3306 Y 1
SFX 3306 0 заць .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 0 скіх .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 скія .
SFX 546 Y 1
SFX 546 0 ага .
SFX 1773 Y 1
SFX 1773 0 аўскаму .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 0 цтва .
SFX 4206 Y 1
SFX 4206 0 цтве .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 рнае .
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 0 рнай .
SFX 4167 Y 1
SFX 4167 0 ерную .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 жваючых .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 0 жваючыя .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 зіўшае .
SFX 1318 Y 1
SFX 1318 0 зіўшай .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 чнасць .
SFX 2476 Y 1
SFX 2476 0 чнасцю .
SFX 2477 Y 1
SFX 2477 0 чнасці .
SFX 4120 Y 1
SFX 4120 0 нікоў .
SFX 3052 Y 1
SFX 3052 0 іраванаю .
SFX 3051 Y 1
SFX 3051 0 іраваная .
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 0 анням .
SFX 2881 Y 1
SFX 2881 0 ніцтвам .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 0 каўшую .
SFX 1506 Y 1
SFX 1506 0 лямі .
SFX 3612 Y 1
SFX 3612 0 ьшчыку .
SFX 3613 Y 1
SFX 3613 0 ьшчыкі .
SFX 1587 Y 1
SFX 1587 0 ліваўшую .
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211 0 іраваўшага .
SFX 1047 Y 1
SFX 1047 0 альнага .
SFX 4052 Y 1
SFX 4052 0 віках .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 нік .
SFX 2807 Y 1
SFX 2807 0 нім .
SFX 4879 Y 1
SFX 4879 0 нін .
SFX 4844 Y 1
SFX 4844 0 цыйнага .
SFX 3084 Y 1
SFX 3084 0 учую .
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 0 ізму .
SFX 1787 Y 1
SFX 1787 0 нешся .
SFX 1023 Y 1
SFX 1023 0 ватую .
SFX 3609 Y 1
SFX 3609 0 ачом .
SFX 4398 Y 1
SFX 4398 0 ула .
SFX 2475 Y 1
SFX 2475 0 ьваецца .
SFX 4133 Y 1
SFX 4133 0 наваць .
SFX 4712 Y 1
SFX 4712 0 нцу .
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 0 нцы .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 ляўшаю .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 ляўшая .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 аеце .
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 0 ыцеся .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 нкамі .
SFX 2410 Y 1
SFX 2410 0 іруючых .
SFX 2409 Y 1
SFX 2409 0 іруючыя .
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 0 гадовае .
SFX 4262 Y 1
SFX 4262 0 гадовай .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 яцца .
SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 0 вата .
SFX 2744 Y 1
SFX 2744 0 хала .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 ха .
SFX 2384 Y 1
SFX 2384 0 шка .
SFX 3038 Y 1
SFX 3038 0 істцы .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 га .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 іўся .
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 0 іс .
SFX 3304 Y 1
SFX 3304 0 іт .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 0 іх .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 іш .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 ію .
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 0 ія .
SFX 1198 Y 1
SFX 1198 0 іі .
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 іў .
SFX 3705 Y 1
SFX 3705 0 рыш .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 рыў .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 0 таваўшы .
SFX 4409 Y 1
SFX 4409 0 оўваць .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 вайся .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 чаўшага .
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 0 аліся .
SFX 4717 Y 1
SFX 4717 0 міце .
SFX 4901 Y 1
SFX 4901 0 жае .
SFX 3757 Y 1
SFX 3757 0 жай .
SFX 2609 Y 1
SFX 2609 0 жам .
SFX 2630 Y 1
SFX 2630 0 еннем .
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 0 каўшымі .
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 0 ваючаю .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 ваючая .
SFX 1480 Y 1
SFX 1480 0 раваўшы .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 віцца .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 шаму .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 шамі .
SFX 2777 Y 1
SFX 2777 0 хаўшага .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 0 нічаўшую .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 овы .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 0 іраваць .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 навым .
SFX 1169 Y 1
SFX 1169 0 ачнымі .
SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 0 інай .
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 0 інам .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 руючага .
SFX 3908 Y 1
SFX 3908 0 таванаму .
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 0 льшчыках .
SFX 3997 Y 1
SFX 3997 0 шчынаю .
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 льшчыкаў .
SFX 4694 Y 1
SFX 4694 0 оўваючымі .
SFX 4544 Y 1
SFX 4544 0 оўнае .
SFX 4216 Y 1
SFX 4216 0 оўнай .
SFX 4389 Y 1
SFX 4389 0 ызацыяй .
SFX 4472 Y 1
SFX 4472 0 заваліся .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 ычны .
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 0 паю .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 паў .
SFX 4466 Y 1
SFX 4466 0 зуецца .
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 0 оўшчыку .
SFX 4336 Y 1
SFX 4336 0 оўшчыкі .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 нічаю .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 нічаў .
SFX 4911 Y 1
SFX 4911 0 дала .
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 0 ованы .
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 0 дзіўшых .
SFX 2509 Y 1
SFX 2509 0 дзіўшыя .
SFX 965 Y 1
SFX 965 0 ўка .
SFX 4419 Y 1
SFX 4419 0 мерам .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 раючаму .
SFX 4439 Y 1
SFX 4439 0 ізуюць .
SFX 1325 Y 1
SFX 1325 0 еную .
SFX 1455 Y 1
SFX 1455 0 ляйцеся .
SFX 4053 Y 1
SFX 4053 0 вікамі .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 уючыся .
SFX 1775 Y 1
SFX 1775 0 аўскага .
SFX 2532 Y 1
SFX 2532 0 ціўшы .
SFX 3146 Y 1
SFX 3146 0 нутым .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 0 раўшы .
SFX 3419 Y 1
SFX 3419 0 цоў .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 ала .
SFX 4054 Y 1
SFX 4054 0 але .
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 0 замі .
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 0 юся .
SFX 2506 Y 1
SFX 2506 0 ніцтва .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 ніцтве .
SFX 4163 Y 1
SFX 4163 0 ерных .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 ерныя .
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 0 жваючае .
SFX 3330 Y 1
SFX 3330 0 жваючай .
SFX 4126 Y 1
SFX 4126 0 нейшую .
SFX 1296 Y 1
SFX 1296 0 каўшых .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 каўшыя .
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 0 ліваўшых .
SFX 1582 Y 1
SFX 1582 0 ліваўшыя .
SFX 3862 Y 1
SFX 3862 0 яем .
SFX 1590 Y 1
SFX 1590 0 ліваўшаму .
SFX 2380 Y 1
SFX 2380 0 ыяю .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 учых .
SFX 3082 Y 1
SFX 3082 0 учыя .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 0 чцы .
SFX 1193 Y 1
SFX 1193 0 каць .
SFX 2694 Y 1
SFX 2694 0 ыну .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 ыны .
SFX 1020 Y 1
SFX 1020 0 ватых .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 ватыя .
SFX 4678 Y 1
SFX 4678 0 хнуўшаю .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 хнуўшая .
SFX 3561 Y 1
SFX 3561 0 унам .
SFX 321 Y 1
SFX 321 0 ніку .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 нікі .
SFX 2419 Y 1
SFX 2419 0 іруючае .
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 0 іруючай .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 наваму .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 талі .
SFX 1456 Y 1
SFX 1456 0 ляйся .
SFX 2367 Y 1
SFX 2367 0 чваць .
SFX 4114 Y 1
SFX 4114 0 нучаю .
SFX 4113 Y 1
SFX 4113 0 нучая .
SFX 4189 Y 1
SFX 4189 0 ыхаю .
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 0 ла .
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 0 ле .
SFX 1749 Y 1
SFX 1749 0 ло .
SFX 4625 Y 1
SFX 4625 0 атарах .
SFX 4922 Y 1
SFX 4922 0 атараў .
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 0 рае .
SFX 1197 Y 1
SFX 1197 0 рай .
SFX 2018 Y 1
SFX 2018 0 рак .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 рам .
SFX 1704 Y 1
SFX 1704 0 аўскую .
SFX 1980 Y 1
SFX 1980 0 зілася .
SFX 1650 Y 1
SFX 1650 0 ннаму .
SFX 4064 Y 1
SFX 4064 0 шыўшымі .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 шага .
SFX 4756 Y 1
SFX 4756 0 зуючымі .
SFX 3573 Y 1
SFX 3573 0 нела .
SFX 4853 Y 1
SFX 4853 0 тоўцы .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 кую .
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 0 нічаўшых .
SFX 2061 Y 1
SFX 2061 0 нічаўшыя .
SFX 3106 Y 1
SFX 3106 0 ннях .
SFX 3034 Y 1
SFX 3034 0 нняў .
SFX 1920 Y 1
SFX 1920 0 ніцкі .
SFX 1929 Y 1
SFX 1929 0 дзіце .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 овачнымі .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 0 таўшаю .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 таўшая .
SFX 3932 Y 1
SFX 3932 0 неюць .
SFX 3234 Y 1
SFX 3234 0 навую .
SFX 3911 Y 1
SFX 3911 0 таванага .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 0 ткай .
SFX 1649 Y 1
SFX 1649 0 ткам .
SFX 3186 Y 1
SFX 3186 0 жваем .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 аваўшаму .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 0 раванаму .
SFX 4861 Y 1
SFX 4861 0 очках .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 0 очкаў .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 чынаю .
SFX 2920 Y 1
SFX 2920 0 арнаю .
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 0 арная .
SFX 3823 Y 1
SFX 3823 0 раючага .
SFX 2519 Y 1
SFX 2519 0 дзіўшае .
SFX 2518 Y 1
SFX 2518 0 дзіўшай .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 роўка .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 зіцца .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 еных .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 еныя .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 уюць .
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 0 авікамі .
SFX 2530 Y 1
SFX 2530 0 ціўшымі .
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 0 іруючаму .
SFX 2317 Y 1
SFX 2317 0 тны .
SFX 4172 Y 1
SFX 4172 0 ернае .
SFX 4171 Y 1
SFX 4171 0 ернай .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 аўцы .
SFX 4123 Y 1
SFX 4123 0 нейшых .
SFX 4122 Y 1
SFX 4122 0 нейшыя .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 авіча .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 ляла .
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 чыся .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 каўшае .
SFX 1303 Y 1
SFX 1303 0 каўшай .
SFX 3147 Y 1
SFX 3147 0 нутую .
SFX 1592 Y 1
SFX 1592 0 ліваўшае .
SFX 1591 Y 1
SFX 1591 0 ліваўшай .
SFX 4205 Y 1
SFX 4205 0 цтву .
SFX 1593 Y 1
SFX 1593 0 ліваўшага .
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 0 рнаю .
SFX 1578 Y 1
SFX 1578 0 рная .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 чаным .
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 0 ыце .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 ешся .
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 0 аючыся .
SFX 4333 Y 1
SFX 4333 0 очка .
SFX 1316 Y 1
SFX 1316 0 зіўшаю .
SFX 1315 Y 1
SFX 1315 0 зіўшая .
SFX 3089 Y 1
SFX 3089 0 учае .
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 0 учай .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 ваўшы .
SFX 3438 Y 1
SFX 3438 0 йскі .
SFX 1958 Y 1
SFX 1958 0 аваты .
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 0 аннях .
SFX 3125 Y 1
SFX 3125 0 анняў .
SFX 1008 Y 1
SFX 1008 0 ватае .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 ватай .
SFX 4918 Y 1
SFX 4918 0 гаем .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 нуўшыся .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 каму .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 камі .
SFX 3286 Y 1
SFX 3286 0 навага .
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 0 ніц .
SFX 4415 Y 1
SFX 4415 0 ніш .
SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 0 нія .
SFX 3832 Y 1
SFX 3832 0 ніў .
SFX 3405 Y 1
SFX 3405 0 чнікам .
SFX 1387 Y 1
SFX 1387 0 ападобны .
SFX 4086 Y 1
SFX 4086 0 улі .
SFX 3005 Y 1
SFX 3005 0 тасць .
SFX 3279 Y 1
SFX 3279 0 тасцю .
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 0 тасці .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 анем .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 віча .
SFX 2742 Y 1
SFX 2742 0 хаўшы .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 падобнаму .
SFX 2984 Y 1
SFX 2984 0 ьскаму .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 гадоваю .
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 0 гадовая .
SFX 1651 Y 1
SFX 1651 0 ннага .
SFX 4065 Y 1
SFX 4065 0 шыўшым .
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 0 ваты .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 0 ху .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 халі .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 хі .
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 0 шку .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 шкі .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 альным .
SFX 3816 Y 1
SFX 3816 0 раючым .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 нуць .
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 0 гу .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 гі .
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 0 тымі .
SFX 2071 Y 1
SFX 2071 0 нічаўшае .
SFX 2070 Y 1
SFX 2070 0 нічаўшай .
